California statutes. Civil Code
(e) The threat to any person that nonpayment of the covered debt may result in the arrest of the debtor or the seizure, garnishment, attachment, or sale of any property or the garnishment or attachment of wages of the debtor, unless the action is in fact contemplated by the debt collector and permitted by the law.

(f) The
 threat to take any action against the debtor, which is prohibited by this title.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 522, Sec. 3.   (SB 1286)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1788.11.

No debt collector shall collect or attempt to collect a covered debt by means of the following practices:

(a) Using obscene or profane language.

(b) Placing a telephone call without disclosing the caller’s identity, provided that an employee of a licensed collection agency may identify oneself by using their registered alias name if they correctly identify the agency that they represent. A debt collector shall provide its California debt collector license number, if applicable, upon the consumer’s request.

(c) Causing expense to any person for long distance telephone calls,
 telegram fees, or charges for other similar communications, by misrepresenting to the person the purpose of the telephone call, telegram or similar communication.

(d) Causing a telephone to ring repeatedly or continuously to annoy the person called.

(e) Communicating, by telephone or in person, with the debtor with such frequency as to be unreasonable, and to constitute harassment of the debtor under the circumstances.

(f) Sending written or digital communication to the person that does not display the California license number of the collector, if applicable, in at least 12-point type.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 522, Sec. 4.   (SB 1286)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1788.12.

No debt collector shall collect or attempt to collect a covered debt or consumer debt, as specified, by means of the following practices:

(a) Communicating with the debtor’s employer regarding the debtor’s consumer debt unless such a communication is necessary to the collection of the consumer debt, or unless the debtor or their attorney has consented in writing to that communication. A communication is necessary to the collection of the consumer debt only if it is made for the purposes of verifying the debtor’s employment, locating the debtor, or effecting garnishment, after
 judgment, of the debtor’s wages, or in the case of a medical debt for the purpose of discovering the existence of medical insurance. Any such communication, other than a communication in the case of a medical debt by a health care provider or its agent for the purpose of discovering the existence of medical insurance, shall be in writing unless that written communication receives no response within 15 days and shall be made only as many times as is necessary to the collection of the consumer debt. Communications to a debtor’s employer regarding a consumer debt shall not contain language that would be improper if the communication were made to the debtor. One communication solely for the purpose of verifying the debtor’s employment may be oral without prior written contact.

(b) Communicating information regarding a
 consumer debt to any member of the debtor’s family, other than the debtor’s spouse or the parents or guardians of the debtor who is either a minor or who resides in the same household with that parent or guardian, prior to obtaining a judgment against the debtor, except where the purpose of the communication is to locate the debtor, or where the debtor or their attorney has consented in writing to that communication.

(c) Communicating to any person any list of debtors that discloses the nature or existence of a covered debt, commonly known as “deadbeat lists,” or advertising any covered debt for sale, by naming the debtor.

(d) Communicating with the debtor by means of a written communication that displays or conveys any information about the covered debt or the debtor other than
 the name, address, and telephone number of the debtor and the debt collector and that is intended both to be seen by any other person and also to embarrass the debtor.

(e) Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions of this section, the disclosure, publication, or communication by a debt collector of information relating to a covered debt or the debtor to a consumer reporting agency or to any other person reasonably believed to have a legitimate business need for that information shall not be deemed to violate this title.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 522, Sec. 5.   (SB 1286)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1788.13.

No debt collector shall collect or attempt to collect a covered debt by means of the following practices:

(a) Any communication with the debtor other than in the name either of the debt collector or the person on whose behalf the debt collector is acting.

(b) Any false representation that any person is an attorney or counselor at law.

(c) Any communication with a debtor in the name of an attorney or counselor at law or upon stationery or like written instruments bearing the name of the attorney or counselor at law, unless that communication
 is by an attorney or counselor at law or shall have been approved or authorized by that attorney or counselor at law.

(d) The representation that any debt collector is vouched for, bonded by, affiliated with, or is an instrumentality, agent or official of any federal, state or local government or any agency of federal, state or local government, unless the collector is actually employed by the particular governmental agency in question and is acting on behalf of that agency in the debt collection matter.

(e) The false representation that the covered debt may be increased by the addition of attorney’s fees, investigation fees, service fees, finance charges, or other charges if, in fact, those fees or charges may not legally be added to the existing obligation.

(f) The false representation that information concerning a debtor’s failure or alleged failure to pay a covered debt has been or is about to be referred to a consumer reporting agency.

(g) The false representation that a debt collector is a consumer reporting agency.

(h) The false representation that collection letters, notices or other printed forms are being sent by or on behalf of a claim, credit, audit, or legal department.

(i) The false representation of the true nature of the business or services being rendered by the debt collector.

(j) The false representation that a legal proceeding has been, is about
 to be, or will be instituted unless payment of a covered debt is made.

(k) The false representation that a covered debt has been, is about to be, or will be sold, assigned, or referred to a debt collector for collection.

(l) Any communication by a collection agency to a debtor demanding money unless the claim is actually assigned to the collection agency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 522, Sec. 6.   (SB 1286)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1788.14.

No debt collector shall collect or attempt to collect a covered debt by means of the following practices:

(a) Obtaining an affirmation from a debtor of a covered debt that has been discharged in bankruptcy, without clearly and conspicuously disclosing to the debtor, in writing, at the time the affirmation is sought, the fact that the debtor is not legally obligated to make an
 affirmation.

(b) Collecting or attempting to collect from the debtor the whole or any part of the debt collector’s fee or charge for services rendered, or other expense incurred by the debt collector in the collection of the covered debt, except as permitted by law.

(c) Initiating communications, other than statements of account, with the debtor with regard to the covered debt, when the debt collector has been previously notified in writing by the debtor’s attorney that the debtor is
 represented by the attorney with respect to the
 covered debt and the notice includes the attorney’s name and address and a request by the attorney that all communications regarding the covered debt be addressed to the attorney, unless the attorney fails to answer correspondence, return telephone calls, or discuss the obligation in question. This subdivision shall not apply if prior approval has been obtained from the debtor’s attorney, or if the communication is a response in the ordinary course of business to a debtor’s inquiry.

(d) Sending a written communication to a debtor in an attempt to collect a time-barred debt without providing the debtor with one of the following written notices:

(1) If the debt is not past the date for obsolescence set forth in Section 605(a) of the federal Fair Credit Reporting Act (15 U.S.C. Sec. 1681c), the following notice shall be included in the first written communication provided to the debtor after the debt has become time-barred:

“The law limits how long you can be sued on a debt. Because of the age of your debt, we will not sue you for it. If you do not pay the debt, [insert name of debt collector] may [continue to] report it to the credit reporting agencies as unpaid for as long as the law permits this reporting.”

(2) If the debt is past the date for obsolescence set forth in Section 605(a) of the federal Fair Credit Reporting Act (15 U.S.C. Sec. 1681c), the following notice shall be included in the first written communication provided to the debtor after the date for obsolescence:

“The law
 limits how long you can be sued on a debt. Because of the age of your debt, we will not sue you for it, and we will not report it to any credit reporting agency.”

(e) Collecting consumer debt that originated with a hospital licensed pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code without including in the first written communication to the debtor a copy of the notice required pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 127425 of the Health and Safety Code and a statement that the debt collector will wait at least 180 days from the date the debtor was initially billed for the hospital services that are the basis of the debt before filing a lawsuit against the debtor.

(f) For purposes of this section, “first written
 communication” means the first communication sent to the debtor in writing or by facsimile, email, or other similar means.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 522, Sec. 7.5.   (SB 1286)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1788.14.5.

(a) A debt collector to which delinquent debt has been assigned shall provide to the debtor, upon the debtor’s written request, a statement that includes all of the following information pursuant to subdivision (c):

(1) That the debt collector has authority to assert the rights of the creditor to collect the debt.

(2) (A) The debt balance and an explanation of the amount, nature, and reason for all interest and fees, if any, imposed by the creditor or any subsequent entities to which the debt was assigned.

(B) The explanation required by
 subparagraph (A) shall identify separately the balance, the total of any interest, and the total of any fees.

(3) The date the debt became delinquent or the date of the last payment.

(4) The name and an address of the creditor and the creditor’s account number associated with the debt. The creditor’s name and address shall be in sufficient form so as to reasonably identify the creditor.

(5) The name and last known address of the debtor as they appeared in the creditor’s records before the assignment of the debt to the debt collector.

(6) The names and addresses of all persons or entities other than the debt collector to which the debt was assigned.
 The names and addresses shall be in sufficient form so as to reasonably identify each assignee.

(7) The California license number of the debt collector, if applicable.

(b) A debt collector to which delinquent debt has been assigned shall not make a written statement to a debtor in an attempt to collect a delinquent debt unless the debt collector has access to a copy of a contract or other document evidencing the debtor’s agreement to the debt, except in the following circumstances:

(1) If the claim is based on debt for which no signed contract or agreement exists, the debt collector shall have access to a copy of a document provided to the debtor while the account was active, demonstrating that the debt was
 incurred by the debtor.

(2) For a revolving credit account, the most recent monthly statement recording a purchase transaction, last payment, or balance transfer shall be deemed sufficient to satisfy the requirements of this subparagraph.

(c) (1) A debt collector to which delinquent debt has been assigned shall provide the information or documents identified in subdivisions (a) and (b) to the debtor without charge within 30 calendar days of receipt of a debtor’s written request for information regarding the debt or proof of the debt.

(2) If the debt collector cannot provide the information or documents within 30 calendar days, the debt collector shall cease all collection of the debt until the debt collector
 provides the debtor the information or documents described in subdivisions (a) and (b).

(d) (1) A debt collector shall provide a debtor with whom it has contact an active postal address to which a debtor may send a request for the information described in this section.

(2) A debt collector may also provide an active email address to which these requests can be sent and through which information and documents can be delivered if the parties agree.

(e) (1) A debt collector to which delinquent debt has been assigned shall include in its first written communication with the debtor in no smaller than 12-point type, a separate prominent notice that contains the following statement:

“You may request records showing the following: (1) that [insert name of debt collector] has the right to seek collection of the debt; (2) the debt balance, including an explanation of any interest charges and additional fees; (3) the date the debt became delinquent or the date of the last payment; (4) the name of the creditor and the account number associated with the debt; (5) the name and last known address of the debtor as it appeared in the creditor’s records prior to assignment of the debt; and (6) the names of all persons or entities other than the debt collector to which the debt has been assigned, if applicable. You may also request from us a copy of the contract or other document evidencing your agreement to the debt.

A request for these records may be addressed to: [insert debt collector’s active
 mailing address and email address, if applicable].”

(2) If a language other than English is principally used by the debt collector in the initial oral contact with the debtor, the notice required by this subdivision shall be provided to the debtor in that language within five business days.

(f) (1) A debt buyer that complies with the requirements of Section 1788.52 shall be deemed to be in compliance with this section.

(2) For purposes of this subdivision, “debt buyer” shall have the same meaning as in Section 1788.50.

(g) For the purposes of this section, the term “delinquent debt” means a covered debt, other than a mortgage debt, that is past
 due at least 90 days and has not been charged off.

(h) This section shall apply to all delinquent consumer debt sold or assigned on or after July 1, 2022.

(i) This section shall apply to all delinquent covered commercial debt sold or assigned on or after July 1, 2025.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 522, Sec. 8.   (SB 1286)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1788.15.

(a) No debt collector shall collect or attempt to collect a covered debt by means of judicial proceedings when the debt collector knows that service of process, where essential to jurisdiction over the debtor or their property, has not been legally effected.

(b) No debt collector shall collect or attempt to collect a covered debt, other than one reduced to judgment, by means of judicial proceedings in a county other than the county in which the debtor has incurred the covered debt or the county in which the debtor resides at the time those proceedings are instituted, or resided at the time the debt was incurred.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), when the obligation of the debtor arises from a guaranty by the debtor of a covered commercial debt, a debt collector may collect or attempt to collect covered commercial debt by means of a judicial proceeding in the county in which the nonnatural person for whose purpose the commercial debt was incurred is located.

(d) This section shall apply to all delinquent covered commercial debt sold or assigned on or after July 1, 2025.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 522, Sec. 9.   (SB 1286)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1788.16.

It is unlawful, with respect to attempted collection of a covered debt, for a debt collector, creditor, or an attorney to send a communication that simulates legal or judicial process or that gives the appearance of being authorized, issued, or approved by a governmental agency or attorney when it is not. Any violation of the provisions of this section is a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment in the county jail not exceeding six months, or by a fine not exceeding two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) or by both.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 522, Sec. 10.   (SB 1286)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1788.17.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this title, every debt collector collecting or attempting to collect a consumer debt shall comply with the provisions of Sections 1692b to 1692j, inclusive, of, and shall be subject to the remedies in Section 1692k of, Title 15 of the United States Code. However, subsection (11) of Section 1692e and Section 1692g shall not apply to any person specified in paragraphs (A) and (B) of subsection (6) of Section 1692a of Title 15 of the United States Code or that person’s principal. The references to federal codes in this section refer to those codes as they read January 1, 2001.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 522, Sec. 11.   (SB 1286)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1788.18.

(a) Upon receipt from a debtor of all of the following, a debt collector shall cease collection activities until completion of the review provided in subdivision (d):

(1) A copy of a Federal Trade Commission (FTC) identity theft report, completed and signed by the debtor. The debtor may choose, instead, to send a copy of a police report filed by the debtor alleging that the debtor is the victim of an identity theft crime, including, but not limited to, a violation of Section 530.5 of the Penal Code, for the specific debt being collected by the debt collector; however, the debt collector shall not also require a police report if the debtor submits an FTC identity theft report.

(2) The debtor’s written statement that the debtor claims to be the victim of identity theft with respect to the specific debt being collected by the debt collector.

(b) The written statement described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) shall consist of either of the following:

(1) A written statement that contains the content of the Identity Theft Victim’s Fraudulent Account Information Request offered to the public by the California Office of Privacy Protection.

(2) A written statement that certifies that the representations are true, correct, and contain no material omissions of fact to the best knowledge and belief of the person submitting the certification.
 A person submitting the certification who declares as true any material matter pursuant to this subdivision that they know to be false is guilty of a misdemeanor. The statement shall contain or be accompanied by the following, to the extent that an item listed below is relevant to the debtor’s allegation of identity theft with respect to the debt in question:

(A) A statement that the debtor is a victim of identity theft.

(B) A copy of the debtor’s driver’s license or identification card, as issued by the state.

(C) Any other identification document that supports the statement of identity theft.

(D) Specific facts supporting the claim of identity theft, if available.

(E) Any explanation showing that the debtor did not incur the debt.

(F) Any available correspondence disputing the debt after transaction information has been provided to the debtor.

(G) Documentation of the residence of the debtor at the time of the alleged debt. This may include copies of bills and statements, such as utility bills, tax statements, or other statements from businesses sent to the debtor, showing that the debtor lived at another residence at the time the debt was incurred.

(H) A telephone number for contacting the debtor concerning any additional information or questions, or direction that further communications to the debtor be in writing only,
 with the mailing address specified in the statement.

(I) To the extent the debtor has information concerning who may have incurred the debt, the identification of any person whom the debtor believes is responsible.

(J) An express statement that the debtor did not authorize the use of the debtor’s name or personal information for incurring the debt.

(K) The certification required pursuant to this paragraph shall be sufficient if it is in substantially the following form:“I certify the representations made are true, correct, and
contain no material omissions of fact.(Date and Place)(Signature) ”(c) If a debtor notifies a debt collector orally that they are a victim of identity theft, the debt collector shall notify the debtor, orally or in writing, that the debtor’s claim must be in writing. If a debtor notifies a debt collector in writing that they are a victim of identity theft,
 but omits information required pursuant to subdivision (a) or, if applicable, the certification required pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b), if the debt collector does not cease collection activities, the debt collector shall provide written notice to the debtor of the additional information that is required, or the certification required pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b), as applicable, or send the debtor a copy of the Federal Trade Commission’s identity theft form.

(d) Within 10 business days of receiving the complete statement and information described in subdivision (a), the debt collector shall, if it furnished adverse information about the debtor to a consumer credit reporting agency, notify the consumer credit reporting agency that the account is disputed, and initiate a review considering all of the information
 provided by the debtor and other information available to the debt collector in its file or from the creditor. The debt collector shall send notice of its determination to the debtor no later than 10 business days after concluding the review. The debt collector may recommence debt collection activities only upon making a good faith determination that the information does not establish that the debtor is not responsible for the specific debt in question. The debt collector’s determination shall be made in a manner consistent with the provisions of subsection (1) of Section 1692f of Title 15 of the United States Code, as incorporated by Section 1788.17 of this code. The debt collector shall notify the debtor in writing of that determination and the basis for that determination before proceeding with any further collection activities. The debt collector’s determination shall be based on all of
 the information provided by the debtor and other information available to the debt collector in its file or from the creditor.

(e) No inference or presumption that the debt is valid or invalid, or that the debtor is liable or not liable for the debt, shall arise if the debt collector decides after the review described in subdivision (d) to cease or recommence the debt collection activities. The exercise or nonexercise of rights under this section is not a waiver of any other right or defense of the debtor or debt collector.

(f) The statement and supporting documents that comply with subdivision (a) may also satisfy, to the extent those documents meet the requirements of, the notice requirement of paragraph (5) of subdivision (c) of Section 1798.93.

(g) A debt collector who ceases collection activities under this section and does not recommence those collection activities shall do both of the following:

(1) If the debt collector has furnished adverse information to a consumer credit reporting agency, notify the agency to delete that
 information no later than 10 business days after making its determination.

(2) Notify the creditor no later than 10 business days after making its determination that debt collection activities have been terminated based upon the debtor’s claim of identity theft.

(h) A debt collector who has possession of documents that the debtor is entitled to request from a creditor pursuant to Section 530.8 of the Penal Code is authorized to provide those documents to the debtor.

(i) Notwithstanding subdivision (h) of Section 1788.2, for the purposes of this section, “debtor” means a natural person, firm, association, organization, partnership, business trust, company, corporation, or limited liability company from
 which a debt collector seeks to collect a debt that is due and owing or alleged to be due and owing from the person or entity. The remedies provided by this title shall apply equally to violations of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 522, Sec. 12.   (SB 1286)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1788.185.

(a) The complaint in an action brought by a debt collector for debt that originated with a general acute care hospital licensed pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code shall allege all of the following:

(1) That the plaintiff is a debt collector.

(2) That the underlying debt originated with a general acute care hospital.

(3) The information contained in paragraph (6) of subdivision (e) of Section 127425 of the Health and Safety Code and a statement identifying the language in which that information was sent
 to the debtor.

(4) The balance of the debt upon assignment to the debt collector and an explanation of the amount, nature, and reason for any interest and fees that are added to the debt balance by the debt collector after the assignment of the debt. This paragraph shall not be deemed to require a specific itemization, but the explanation shall identify separately the charge-off balance of the debt upon assignment to the debt collector, the total of any interest, and the total of any fees added to the debt balance by the debt collector after the assignment of the debt.

(5) The date of default or the date of the last payment, and the date the debt was assigned.

(6) The name and address of the hospital at the time of assignment.

(7) The hospital’s account number associated with the debt.

(b) Copies of the application for financial assistance that was provided to the debtor by the hospital and the notice that was provided to the debtor by the hospital about applying for financial assistance shall be attached to the complaint. If the notice was provided as part of the hospital bill that cannot be separated, the bill shall be redacted to remove confidential information or a sample hospital bill with the substance of the notice regarding financial assistance in the format in use at the time the patient was billed may be provided.

(c) This title does not require the disclosure in public records of personal, financial, or medical information, the
 confidentiality of which is protected by state or federal law. The plaintiff shall
 redact protected information filed with the complaint.

(d) A default or other judgment shall not be entered against a debtor for debt pursuant to this section unless business records, authenticated through a sworn declaration, are submitted by the debt collector to the court to establish the facts required to be alleged pursuant to subdivision (a).

(e) If a debt collector plaintiff seeks a default judgment and has not complied with this title, the court shall not enter a default judgment for the plaintiff and may, in its discretion, dismiss the action.

(f) Except as provided in this title, this section does not modify or otherwise amend the procedures established in Section 585 of the Code of Civil
 Procedure.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 473, Sec. 2.   (AB 1020)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Debtor Responsibilities [1788.20. - 1788.22.]

1788.20.

In connection with any request or application for covered credit, no person shall:

(a) Request or apply for that credit at a time when that person knows there is no reasonable probability of that person’s being able, or that person then lacks the intention, to pay the obligation created thereby in accordance with the terms and conditions of the credit extension.

(b) Knowingly submit false or inaccurate information or willfully conceal adverse information bearing upon that person’s credit worthiness, credit standing, or credit capacity.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 522, Sec. 13.   (SB 1286)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1788.21.

(a) In connection with any covered credit existing or requested to be extended to a person, that person shall within a reasonable time notify the creditor or prospective creditor of any change in that person’s name, address, or employment.

(b) Each responsibility set forth in subdivision (a) shall apply only if and after the creditor clearly and conspicuously in writing discloses that responsibility to that person.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 522, Sec. 14.   (SB 1286)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1788.22.

(a) In connection with any covered credit extended to a person under an account:

(1) No such person shall attempt to consummate any covered credit transaction thereunder knowing that credit privileges under the account have been terminated or suspended.

(2) Each such person shall notify the creditor by telephone,
 telegraph, letter, or any other reasonable means that an unauthorized use of the account has occurred or may occur as the result of loss or theft of a credit card, or other instrument identifying the account, within a reasonable time after that person’s discovery thereof, and shall reasonably assist the creditor in determining the facts and circumstances relating to any unauthorized use of the account.

(b) Each responsibility set forth in subdivision (a) shall apply only if and after the creditor clearly and conspicuously in writing discloses that responsibility to that person.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 522, Sec. 15.   (SB 1286)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Enforcement [1788.30. - 1788.33.]

1788.30.

(a) Any debt collector who violates this title with respect to any debtor shall be liable to that debtor only in an individual action, and his liability therein to that debtor shall be in an amount equal to the sum of any actual damages sustained by the debtor as a result of the violation.

(b) Any debt collector who willfully and knowingly violates this title with respect to any debtor shall, in addition to actual damages sustained by the debtor as a result of the violation, also be liable to the debtor only in an individual action, and his additional liability therein to that debtor
shall be for a penalty in such amount as the court may allow, which shall not be less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor greater than one thousand dollars ($1,000).

(c) In the case of any action to enforce any liability under this title, the prevailing party shall be entitled to costs of the action. Reasonable attorney’s fees, which shall be based on time necessarily expended to enforce the liability, shall be awarded to a prevailing debtor; reasonable attorney’s fees may be awarded to a prevailing creditor upon a finding by the court that the debtor’s prosecution or defense of the action was not in good faith.

(d) A debt collector shall have no civil liability under this title if, within 15 days either after discovering a violation which is able to be cured, or after the receipt of a written notice of such violation, the debt collector notifies the debtor of the violation, and
makes whatever adjustments or corrections are necessary to cure the violation with respect to the debtor.

(e) A debt collector shall have no civil liability to which such debt collector might otherwise be subject for a violation of this title, if the debt collector shows by a preponderance of evidence that the violation was not intentional and resulted notwithstanding the maintenance of procedures reasonably adapted to avoid any such violation.

(f) Any action under this section may be brought in any appropriate court of competent jurisdiction in an individual capacity only, within one year from the date of the occurrence of the violation.

(g) Any intentional violation of the provisions of this title by the debtor may be raised as a defense by the debt collector, if such violation is pertinent or relevant to any claim
or action brought against the debt collector by or on behalf of the debtor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 907.)
-------------------------------------------

1788.31.

If any provision of this title, or the application thereof to any person or circumstances, is held invalid, the remaining provisions of this title, or the application of such provisions to other persons or circumstances, shall not be affected thereby.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 907.)
-------------------------------------------

1788.32.

The remedies provided herein are intended to be cumulative and are in addition to any other procedures, rights, or remedies under any other provision of law. The enactment of this title shall not supersede existing administrative regulations of the Director of Consumer Affairs except to the extent that those regulations are inconsistent with the provisions of this title.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 907.)
-------------------------------------------

1788.33.

Any waiver of the provisions of this title is contrary to public policy, and is void and unenforceable.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 815, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



  TITLE 1.6C.5. Fair Debt Buying Practices [1788.50. - 1788.66.]

1788.50.

(a) As used in this title:

(1) “Debt buyer” means a person or entity that is regularly engaged in the business of purchasing charged-off consumer debt for collection purposes, whether it collects the debt itself, hires a third party for collection, or hires an attorney-at-law for collection litigation. “Debt buyer” does not mean a person or entity that acquires a charged-off consumer debt incidental
 to the purchase of a portfolio predominantly consisting of consumer debt that has not been charged off.

(2) “Charged-off consumer debt” means a consumer debt that has been removed from a creditor’s books as an asset and treated as a loss or expense.

(b) The acquisition by a check services company of the right to collect on a paper or electronic check instrument, including an Automated Clearing House item, that has been returned unpaid to a merchant does not constitute a purchase of delinquent consumer debt under this title.

(c) Terms defined in Title 1.6C (commencing with Section 1788) shall apply to this title.

(d) This title shall apply to debt buyers with respect to all consumer debt sold or resold on or after January 1, 2014.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 64, Sec. 2.   (SB 233)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

1788.52.

(a) A debt buyer shall not make any written statement to a debtor in an attempt to collect a consumer debt unless the debt buyer possesses the following information:

(1) That the debt buyer is the sole owner of the debt at issue or has authority to assert the rights of all owners of the debt.

(2) The debt balance at charge off and an explanation of the amount, nature, and reason for all post-charge-off interest and fees, if any, imposed by the charge-off creditor or any subsequent purchasers of the debt. This paragraph shall not be deemed to require a specific itemization, but the explanation shall identify separately the
 charge-off balance, the total of any post-charge-off interest, and the total of any post-charge-off fees.

(3) The date of default or the date of the last payment.

(4) The name and an address of the charge-off creditor at the time of charge off, and the charge-off creditor’s account number associated with the debt. The charge-off creditor’s name and address shall be in sufficient form so as to reasonably identify the charge-off creditor.

(5) The name and last known address of the debtor as they appeared in the charge-off creditor’s records prior to the sale of the debt. If the debt was sold prior to January 1, 2014, the name and last known address of the debtor as they appeared in the debt owner’s records on December 31,
 2013, shall be sufficient.

(6) The names and addresses of all persons or entities that purchased the debt after charge off, including the debt buyer making the written statement. The names and addresses shall be in sufficient form so as to reasonably identify each such purchaser.

(7) The California license number of the debt buyer.

(b) A debt buyer shall not make any written statement to a debtor in an attempt to collect a consumer debt unless the debt buyer has access to a copy of a contract or other document evidencing the debtor’s agreement to the debt. If the claim is based on debt for which no signed contract or agreement exists, the debt buyer shall have access to a copy of a document provided to the debtor while the
 account was active, demonstrating that the debt was incurred by the debtor. For a revolving credit account, the most recent monthly statement recording a purchase transaction, last payment, or balance transfer shall be deemed sufficient to satisfy this
 requirement.

(c) A debt buyer shall provide the information or documents identified in subdivisions (a) and (b) to the debtor without charge within 15 calendar days of receipt of a debtor’s written request for information regarding the debt or proof of the debt. If the debt buyer cannot provide the information or documents within 15 calendar days, the debt buyer shall cease all collection of the debt until the debt buyer provides the debtor the information or documents described in subdivisions (a) and (b). Except as provided otherwise in this title, the request by the debtor shall be consistent with the validation requirements contained in Section 1692g of Title 15 of the United States Code. A debt buyer shall provide all debtors with whom it has contact an active postal address to which these requests can be sent. A debt buyer
 may also provide an active email address to which these requests can be sent and through which information and documents can be delivered, if the parties agree.

(d) (1) A debt buyer shall include with its first written communication with the debtor in no smaller than 12-point type, a separate prominent notice that provides: